North Carolina, session 2025, SB365.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-288.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-288.6. Looting; trespass during emergency.
(a) Any person who enters upon the premises of another without legal justification when
the usual security of property is not effective due to the occurrence or aftermath of riot,
insurrection, invasion, storm, fire, explosion, flood, collapse, or other disaster or calamity is
guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor of trespass during an emergency.
(b) Any person who commits the crime of trespass during emergency and, without legal
justification, obtains or exerts control over, damages, ransacks, or destroys the property of
another is guilty of the felony of looting and shall be punished as a Class H felon.
(b1) Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing greater
punishment, any person who (i) enters the premises of another without legal justification, in a
county located in an emergency area during a state of emergency, and (ii) without legal
justification obtains or exerts control over, damages, ransacks, or destroys the temporary housing
of another is guilty of a Class F felony. The following definitions apply to this subsection:
(1) Emergency area. – As defined in G.S. 166A-19.3.
(2) State of emergency. – As defined in G.S. 166A-19.3.
(3) Temporary housing. – Any of the following:
a. A tent, trailer, mobile home, or any other structure being used for
human shelter which is designed to be transportable and is not attached
to the ground, to another structure, or to any utility system on the same
premises.
b. A vehicular unit being used as temporary living quarters.
c. Any equipment used to transport or deliver a structure or vehicle
described in sub-subdivision a. or b. of this subdivision.
d. Any item attached, affixed, or connected to, or intended to be attached,
connected, or affixed to, a structure or vehicle described in
sub-subdivision a. or b. of this subdivision to provide air conditioning,
heating, or a source of power for the structure or vehicle.
*S365-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Any person whose person or property is injured by reason of a violation of this section
may sue for and recover from the violator three times the actual damages sustained, as well as
court costs and attorneys' fees."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 365-First Edition